Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 102 The Rhode Island Teachers’ Advisory Council

16-102-1.
Legislative purpose.

It is the purpose of the Rhode Island teachers’ advisory council to provide a streamlined communication mechanism between teachers and the state board of education, the policy setting board of elementary and secondary education by:

Providing teachers with the ability to inform policymakers about implementation, concerns, and or practical issues regarding regulations and/or policies, whether proposed or promulgated;

Bringing voices of classroom teachers into the conversation about policies and regulations which impact classroom activities; and

Improving the conversation about the policies and regulations regarding our education system to ensure their successful implementation that benefits all Rhode Island students.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 330, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 433, § 1.

16-102-2.
Rhode Island Teachers’ Advisory Council established.

There is hereby established a Rhode Island teachers’ advisory council, hereinafter referred to as “RITAC,” that shall advise the board of regents for elementary and secondary education and/or the state board of education, whichever body is in effect at the time. RITAC shall be comprised of one teacher from each school district chosen by the districts’ state association of teacher representatives, such as the national education association and the Rhode Island federation of teachers and health professionals, in conjunction with the local district teacher representative in a manner that they deem appropriate. The Rhode Island league of charter schools shall choose two (2) teachers from its public charter schools in a manner that it deems appropriate. The Rhode Island mayoral academies shall choose one teacher from its mayoral academies in a manner that it deems appropriate. The term of each teacher representative shall be two (2) years. Each representative shall be chosen within ninety (90) days of passage and by October 1 every two (2) years thereafter. Upon organization, the members of RITAC shall elect a chairperson and any other officers.

RITAC shall meet no less than four (4) times per year and provide the board of regents for elementary and secondary education and/or the state board of education, whichever board is in effect, with a minimum of quarterly reports at a regularly scheduled board meeting.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 330, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 433, § 1.